FST/Tur/turkish.foma
# Define Vowel Categories

# Define front vowels
define Vf [ e | i | ö | ü | E | İ | Ö | Ü | î | Î ];

# Define back vowels
define Vb  [ a | ı | o | u | A | I | O | U | â | Â | û | Û ];

# Define high vowels
define Vh  [ i | ü | ı | u | İ | Ü | I | U | î | Î | û | Û | %^si | %^sü | %^sı | %^sus ];

# Define low vowels
define Vl  [ e | ö | a | o | E | Ö | A | O | â | Â | %^se | %^sö | %^sa | %^so ];

# Define front-round vowels
define Vfr  [ ö | ü | Ö | Ü ];

# Define front-unrounded vowels
define Vfu  [ e | i | E | İ | î | Î ];

# Define back-round vowels
define Vbr [ o | u | O | U | û | Û ];

# Define back-unrounded vowels
define Vbu  [ a | ı | A | I | â | Â ];

define Vowel  Vf | Vb;

# Define surface vowels
define Vsurface  [ e | i | ö | ü | E | İ | Ö | Ü | î | Î |
                  a | ı | o | u | A | I | O | U | â | Â | û | Û ];

#Define Buffer Vowels
define bufI [ı | i | u | ü ];

define bufA [ a | e ];

#Define Palatal Vowels
define Vpal %^pA | %^pI | %^pO | %^pU | %^pÂ | %^pÎ | %^pÔ |%^pÛ;

define Vxx  %^A | %^I ;

define Vsilent %^sFRV | %^sFUV | %^sBRV | %^sBUV ; 

#Define all Vowels
define Vall Vowel | Vxx | Vpal | Vsilent; ! except buffer vowels

# define consonant categories
define ConsV [ b | d | c | g | v | z | j | f | ğ | l | m | n | r | w | y | 
             B | D | C | G | V | Z | J | F | Ğ | L | M | N | R | W | Y ];

define ConsUV [ p | t | ç | k | f | s | ş | h | 
	      P | T | Ç | K | F | S | Ş | H ];

#Define Consonants
define Cons  ConsV | ConsUV;

#Define Consonant Buffers
define ConsBuf %^%(y%) | %^%(s%) | %^%(ş%) | %^%(n%);

define ConsXX    %^c | %^p | %^t | %^k | %^g | %^K | %^D | %^C | %@LN ;

define Cbuf [ c | ç ];

define Dbuf [ d | t ];

#Define Silent Consonant
define ConsSilent %^sVC |  %^sUC;

# Define all consonant categories except buffers
define ConsAll  Cons | ConsXX |ConsSilent; ! except buffers

# Define Surface Consonants
define ConsSurface [ b | d | c | g | v | z | j | f | ğ | l | m | n | r | w | y | 
B | D | C | G | V | Z | J | F | Ğ | L | M | N | R | W | Y |
p | t | ç | k | f | s | ş | h | 
P | T | Ç | K | F | S | Ş | H ];

read lexc tur_nouns.lexc
define Lexicon;

#Define Plural morpheme alternations
define PluralAlternation l a r -> l e r || Vf "^" _ ,,
                         l a r -> l e r || Vf ConsAll "^" _;

#Define K Alternations
#efine KAlternations k -> ğ || _ "^" Vall;


#Define Dative Singular Case Alternations
define DativeSgAlternations y e -> y a || Vb "^" _ ,,
                                  y e -> e || Vf ConsAll "^" _ ,,
         		          y e -> a || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
				  y e -> e || Vf ConsAll ConsAll"^" _ ,,
				  y e -> a || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;
                                  
#Define Dative Plural Case Alternations
define DativePlAlternations l e r e -> l a r a || Vb "^" _;


#Define Locative Plural Alternations
define LocativePl l e r d e -> l a r d a || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  l e r d e -> l a r d a || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  l e r d e -> l a r d a || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

#Define Locative Singular Alternations
define LocativeSg d e -> d a || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  d e -> t e || Vf ConsUV "^" _ ,,
		  d e -> t a || Vb ConsUV "^" _;

#Define Genetive Alternations
define GenetiveSg u n -> i n || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                  u n -> ı n || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  u n -> ü n || Vfr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
	          u n -> i n || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                  u n -> ı n || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
	          u n -> ü n || Vfr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  u n -> n u n || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		  u n -> n ü n || ConsAll Vfr "^" _ ,,
		  u n -> n i n || ConsAll Vfu "^" _ ,,
		  u n -> n ı n || ConsAll Vbu "^" _;

define GenetivePl l e r i n -> l a r ı n || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                  l e r i n -> l a r ı n || Vb "^" _;
                 #Compound nouns: larının and lerinin


#Define Accusative Alternations
define AccusativeSg i -> ü || Vfr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                    i -> u || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		    i -> ı || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		    i -> ü || Vfr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		    i -> u || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		    i -> ı || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		    i -> y ı || [ b | d | c | g | v | z | j | f | l | m | n | r | w | y ] Vbu "^" _ ,,
		    i -> y i || [ b | d | c | g | v | z | j | f | l | m | n | r | w | y ] Vfu "^" _ ,,
		    i -> n ı || ğ ı "^" _ ,,
		    i -> n i || ğ i "^" _ ,,
		    i -> y u || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		    i -> y ü || ConsAll Vfr "^" _;

     # Note: It's not very clear what condition determines a y insertion and an n insertion when marking accussative singular case. 
     #As 'ni', 'nu', nı, nü


define AccusativePl l e r i -> l a r ı || Vb "^" _ ,,
                    l e r i -> l a r ı || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		    l e r i -> l a r ı || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;
                    #Whenever 'n' is inserted for singular case, an 'ni' is added to the plural case e.g., lerini or larını.
                                                             

#Define Abulative case alternations
define AbulativeSg d e n -> d a n || Vb "^" _ ,,
                   d e n -> d a n || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		   d e n -> d a n || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

define AbulativePl l e r d e n -> l a r d a n || Vb "^" _ ,,
                   l e r d e n -> l a r d a n || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		   l e r d e n -> l a r d a n || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

#Define first person possessive alternations for nominative case
define Pss1pNomSg m i z -> ı m ı z || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                  m i z -> ı m ı z || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m i z -> u m u z || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m i z -> i m i z || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m i z -> u m u z || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^"_ ,,
		  m i z -> m u z || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		  m i z -> m ı z || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
		  m i z -> m ü z || ConsAll Vfr "^" _ ,,
		  m i z -> ü m ü z || Vfr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m i z -> ü m ü z || Vfr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;
		
define Pss1pNomPl l e r i m i z -> l a r ı m ı z || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  l e r i m i z -> l a r ı m ı z || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  l e r i m i z -> l a r ı m ı z || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;


#Define Dative case for first person Possesive
define Pss1pDatSg m i z e -> i m i z e || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                  m i z e -> i m i z e || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m i z e -> u m u z a || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m i z e -> u m u z a || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m i z e -> m u z a || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		  m i z e -> ı m ı z a || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m i z e -> ı m ı z a || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m i z e -> m ı z a || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
		  m i z e -> ü m ü z e || Vfr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m i z e -> ü m ü z e || Vfr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m i z e -> m ü z e || ConsAll Vfr "^" _;

define Pss1pDatPl l e r i m i z e -> l a r ı m ı z a || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  l e r i m i z e -> l a r ı m ı z a || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  l e r i m i z e -> l a r ı m ı z a || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

#Define PSS1P for Genetive case
define Pss1pGenSg ü m ü z ü n -> m ü z ü n || ConsAll Vfr "^" _ ,,
                  ü m ü z ü n -> i m i z i n || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü n -> i m i z i n || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü n -> m i z i n || ConsAll Vfu "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü n -> ı m ı z ı n || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü n -> ı m ı z ı n || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü n -> m ı z ı n || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü n -> u m u z u n || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü n -> u m u z u n || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                  ü m ü z ü n -> m u z u n || ConsAll Vbr "^" _;


define Pss1pGenPl l e r i m i z i n -> l a r ı m ı z ı n || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  l e r i m i z i n -> l a r ı m ı z ı n || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  l e r i m i z i n -> l a r ı m ı z ı n || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;


#Define PSS1P for Accusative Case
define Pss1pAccSg ü m ü z ü -> m ü z ü || ConsAll Vfr "^" _ ,,
                  ü m ü z ü -> i m i z i || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü -> i m i z i || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü -> m i z i || ConsAll Vfu "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü -> ı m ı z ı || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü -> ı m ı z ı || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü -> m ı z ı || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
                  ü m ü z ü -> m u z u || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü -> u m u z u || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z ü -> u m u z u || Vbr ConsAll "^" _;

define Pss1pAccPl l e r i m i z i -> l a r ı m ı z ı || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  l e r i m i z i -> l a r ı m ı z ı || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  l e r i m i z i -> l a r ı m ı z ı || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;
		                  
		                  
#Define PSS1P for Ablative case
define Pss1pAblSg ü m ü z d e n -> m ü z d e n || ConsAll Vfr "^" _ ,,
                  ü m ü z d e n -> i m i z d e n || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e n -> i m i z d e n || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e n -> m i z d e n || ConsAll Vfu "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e n -> ı m ı z d a n || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e n -> ı m ı z d a n || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e n -> m ı z d a n || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e n -> m u z d a n || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e n -> u m u z d a n || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e n -> u m u z d a n || Vbr ConsAll "^" _;

	  
define Pss1pAblPl  m ı z d a n -> l a r ı m ı z d a n || Vb "^" _ ,,
                   m ı z d a n -> l a r ı m ı z d a n || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		   m ı z d a n -> l a r ı m ı z d a n || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		   m ı z d a n -> l e r i m i z d e n || Vf "^" _ ,,
                   m ı z d a n -> l e r i m i z d e n || Vf ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		   m ı z d a n -> l e r i m i z d e n || Vf ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

#Define PSS1P for Locative case
define Pss1pLOCSG ü m ü z d e -> ı m ı z d a || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                  ü m ü z d e -> ı m ı z d a || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e -> m ı z d a || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e -> i m i z d e || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e -> i m i z d e || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e -> m i z d e || ConsAll Vfu "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e -> u m u z d a || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e -> u m u z d a || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e -> m u z d a || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		  ü m ü z d e -> m ü z d e || ConsAll Vfr "^" _;

define Pss1pLOCPL l e r i m i z d e -> l a r ı m ı z d a || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  l e r i m i z d e -> l a r ı m ı z d a || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  l e r i m i z d e -> l a r ı m ı z d a || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

#Define PSS2P for Nominative Case
define Pss2pNomSG n i z -> i n i z || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                  n i z -> i n i z || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n i z -> ü n ü z || Vfr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n i z -> ü n ü z || Vfr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n i z -> n ü z || ConsAll Vfr "^" _ ,,
		  n i z -> u n u z || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n i z -> u n u z || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n i z -> n u z || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		  n i z -> ı n ı z || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n i z -> ı n ı z || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n i z -> n ı z || ConsAll Vbu "^" _;


define Pss2pNomPl l e r i n i z -> l a r ı n ı z || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  l e r i n i z -> l a r ı n ı z || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  l e r i n i z -> l a r ı n ı z || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;
